tr: Taban hamuru tat profili: Nötr; Tuzlu; Tatlı; Diğer
lt-LT: Plutos skonio profilis: Neutralus; Pikantiškas; Saldus; Kita
nl: Korst smaakprofiel: Neutraal; Hartig; Zoet; Overig
zh-TW: 餅皮風味特徵: 中性; 鹹味; 甜味; 其他
hr-HR: Profil okusa korice: Neutralni; Slani; Slatki; Ostalo
es: Perfil de sabor de la corteza: Neutro; Salado; Dulce; Otro
cs: Chuťový profil kůrky: Neutrální; Slaný; Sladký; Ostatní
sl-SI: Profil okusa skorje: Nevtralno; Slano; Sladko; Drugo
pt-PT: Perfil de sabor da crosta: Neutro; Salgado; Doce; Outro
ko: 크러스트 맛 특성: 중성적인 맛; 짭짤한 맛; 단맛; 기타
el: Γευστικό προφίλ ζύμης: Ουδέτερο; Αλμυρό; Γλυκό; Άλλο
nb: Skorpens smak: Nøytral; Salt/umami; Søt; Annet
th: ลักษณะเด่นของรสชาติแป้งพาย: รสจืด; รสเค็ม/ของคาว; รสหวาน; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Profil chuti kôrky: Neutrálny; Slaný; Sladký; Iné
de: Geschmacksprofil der Kruste: Neutral; Herzhaft; Süß; Sonstige
vi: Hồ sơ hương vị vỏ bánh: Trung tính; Mặn; Ngọt; Khác
sv: Skorpa Taste: Neutral; Salt; Söt; Övrigt
fi: Kuoren makuprofiili: Neutraali; Suolainen; Makea; Muu
en: Crust taste profile: Neutral; Savory; Sweet; Other
bg-BG: Профил на вкуса на кората: Неутрален; Солен; Сладък; Други
ja: クラストのTasteプロファイル: ニュートラル; セイボリー; スイート; その他
hu: Kéreg íze: Semleges; Sós; Édes; Egyéb
fr: Profil gustatif de la croûte: Neutre; Salé; Sucré; Autre
pl: Profil smakowy spodu: Neutralny; Wytrawny; Słodki; Inne
ro-RO: Profilul de gust al crustei: Neutru; Sărat; Dulce; Altele
da: Skorpens smagsprofil: Neutral; Saltet; Sød; Andet
zh-CN: 饼皮风味特征: 中性; 咸味; 甜味; 其他
ru: Вкусовой профиль корочки: Нейтральный; Пикантный; Сладкий; Другое
pt-BR: Perfil de sabor da crosta: Neutro; Salgado; Doce; Outro
it: Profilo Taste della crosta: Neutro; Salato; Dolce; Altro